Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.280

Resignation or removal of receiver.

(1) The court shall remove or replace the receiver on application of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed, the receiver, or any creditor, or on the court's own motion, if the receiver fails to execute and file the bond required by RCW 7.60.045, or if the receiver resigns or refuses or fails to serve for any reason, or for other good cause.

(2) Upon removal, resignation, or death of the receiver, the court shall appoint a successor receiver if the court determines that further administration of the estate is required. Upon executing and filing a bond under RCW 7.60.045, the successor receiver shall immediately take possession of the estate and assume the duties of receiver.

(3) Whenever the court is satisfied that the receiver so removed or replaced has fully accounted for and turned over to the successor receiver appointed by the court all of the property of the estate and has filed a report of all receipts and disbursements during the person's tenure as receiver, the court shall enter an order discharging that person from all further duties and responsibilities as receiver after notice and a hearing.

[ 2004 c 165 s 30.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.